North Dakota, session 69, HB1319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 21-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Legacy fund disclosure website.
1. The state investment board shall maintain a publicly accessible website containing information
regarding all legacy fund investments.
2. The website must list all companies, funds, and other financial mechanisms in which the
legacy fund is invested in accordance with state and federal laws.
3. Within the limits of legislative appropriations, the state retirement and investment office may
spend moneys necessary for the development and maintenance of the website.

H. B. NO. 1319 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1319.
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 1 Absent 0
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State